Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 31. Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact of 1966.
The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to establish and maintain a system of pensions and retirement benefits for such officers and employees of the Authority as may be designated or described by resolution of the Authority; to fix the terms of and restrictions on admission to such system and the classifications therein; to provide that persons eligible for admission in such pension system shall not be eligible for admission to, or receive any benefits from, any other pension system (except Social Security benefits), which is financed or funded, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly by funds paid or appropriated by the Authority to such other pension system, and to provide in connection with such pension system, a system of benefits payable to the beneficiaries and dependents of any participant in such pension system after the death of such participant (whether accidental or otherwise, whether occurring in the actual performance of duty or otherwise, or both) subject to such exceptions, conditions, restrictions and classifications as may be provided by resolution of the Authority. Such pension system shall be financed or funded by such means and in such manner as may be determined by the Authority to be economically feasible. Unless the Authority shall otherwise determine, no officer or employee of the Authority and no beneficiary or dependent of any such officer or employee shall be eligible to receive any pension or retirement or other benefits both from or under any such pension system and from or under any pension or retirement system established by an acquired transportation system or established or provided for, by or under the provisions of any collective bargaining agreement between the Authority and the representatives of its employees.

Whenever the Authority acquires existing transit facilities from a public or privately owned utility either in proceeding by eminent domain or otherwise, the Authority shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts and pension obligations. When the Authority acquires an existing transportation system, all employees who are necessary for the operation thereof by the Authority shall be transferred to and appointed as employees of the Authority, subject to all the rights and benefits of this Title. These employees shall be given seniority credit and sick leave, vacation, insurance and pension credits in accordance with the records or labor agreements from the acquired transportation system. Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by the acquired transportation system shall continue to have rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system. The Authority shall assume the obligations of any transportation system acquired by it with regard to wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, sick leave, health and welfare and pension or retirement provisions for employees. It shall assume the provisions of any collective bargaining agreement between such acquired transportation system and the representatives of its employees. The Authority and the employees, through their representatives for collective bargaining purposes, shall take whatever action may be necessary to have pension trust funds presently under the joint control of the acquired transportation system and the participating employees through their representative transferred to the trust fund to be established, maintained and administered jointly by the Authority and the participating employees through their representatives. No employee of any acquired transportation system who is transferred to a position with the Authority shall by reason of such transfer be placed in any worse position with respect to workmen’s compensation, pension, seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation, health and welfare insurance or any other benefits, than he enjoyed as an employee of such acquired transportation system.

The Authority shall not require any person, as a condition of employment or continuation of employment, to join any labor union or labor organization. The Authority shall not require any person, as a condition of employment or continuation of employment, to pay any dues, fees, or other charges of any kind to any labor union or labor organization.

Article XV Relocation Assistance

Relocation Program and Payments

Section 7 of the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, and as the same may from time to time be amended, and all regulations promulgated thereunder, are hereby made applicable to individuals, families, business concerns and nonprofit organizations displaced from real property by actions of the Authority without regard to whether financial assistance is sought by or extended to the Authority under any provision of that Act; provided, however, that in the event real property is acquired for the Authority by an agency of the federal government, or by a State or local agency or instrumentality, the Authority is authorized to reimburse the acquiring agency for relocation payments made by it.Relocation of Public or Public Utility Facilities

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 67 of this Article XV, any highway or other public facility or any facilities of a public utility company which will be dislocated by reason of a project deemed necessary by the Board to effectuate the authorized purposes of this Title shall be relocated if such facilities are devoted to a public use, and the reasonable cost of relocation, if substitute facilities are necessary, shall be paid by the Board from any of its moneys.

Article XVI General Provisions

Creation and Administration of Funds

The Board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as may be required. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the Board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the Board. Moneys and such funds and other moneys of the Authority shall be deposited, as directed by the Board, in any branch or subsidiary of any state or national bank which has operations within the Zone, and having a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The trust department of any such state or national bank may be designated as a depositary to receive any securities acquired or owned by the Authority. The restriction with respect to paid-in capital may be waived for any such bank which agrees to pledge federal securities to protect the funds and securities of the Authority in such amounts and pursuant to such arrangements as may be acceptable to the Board.

Any moneys of the Authority may, in the discretion of the Board and subject to any agreement or covenant between the Authority and the holders of any of its obligations limiting or restricting classes of investments, be invested in: (i) Direct obligations of or obligations guaranteed by the United States of America; (ii) Bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued by agencies of the United States of America, including but not limited to the following: Bank for Cooperatives; Federal Intermediate Credit Banks; Federal Home Loan Bank System; Export-Import Bank of the United States; Federal Land Banks, Federal National Mortgage Association; Student Loan Marketing Association; Government National Mortgage Association; Tennessee Valley Authority; or United States Postal Service; (iii) Securities that qualify as lawful investments and may be accepted as security for fiduciary, trust and public funds under the control of the United States or any officer or officers thereof, or securities eligible as collateral for deposits of moneys of the United States, including United States Treasury tax and loan accounts; (iv) Domestic and Eurodollar certificates of deposit; and (v) Bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued by a domestic corporation, such as a corporation organized under the laws of one of the states of the United States, provided that such obligations are nonconvertible and at the time of their purchase are rated in the highest rating categories by a nationally recognized bond rating agency.Annual Independent Audit

As soon as practical after the closing of the fiscal year, an audit shall be made of the financial accounts of the Authority. The audit shall be made by qualified certified public accountants selected by the Board, who shall have no personal interest direct or indirect in the financial affairs of the Authority or any of its officers or employees. The report of audit shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted auditing principles and shall be filed with the Chairman and other officers as the Board shall direct. Copies of the report shall be distributed to each Director, to the Congress, to the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia, to the Governors of Virginia and Maryland, to the Washington Suburban Transit Commission, to the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission and to the governing bodies of the political subdivisions located within the Zone which are parties to commitments for participation in the financing of the Authority and shall be made available for public distribution.

The financial transactions of the Board shall be subject to audit by the United States General Accounting Office in accordance with the principles and procedures applicable to commercial corporate transactions and under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Comptroller General of the United States. The audit shall be conducted at the place or places where the accounts of the Board are kept.

Any Director, officer or employee who shall refuse to give all required assistance and information to the accountants selected by the Board or who shall refuse to submit to them for examination such books, documents, records, files, accounts, papers, things or property as may be requested shall, in the discretion of the Board, forfeit his office.Reports

The Board shall make and publish an annual report on its programs, operations, and finances, which shall be distributed in the same manner provided by § 70 of this Article XVI for the report of annual audit. It may also prepare, publish and distribute such other public reports and informational materials as it may deem necessary or desirable.Insurance

The Board may self-insure or purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor against loss or damage to any of its properties; against liability for injury to persons or property; and against loss of revenue from any cause whatsoever. Such insurance coverage shall be in such form and amount as the Board may determine, subject to the requirements of any agreement arising out of insurance of bonds or other obligations by the Authority.Contracting and Purchasing

Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), and (f) of this section, and except in the case of procurement procedures otherwise expressly authorized by statute, the Authority in conducting a procurement of property, services, or construction shall:

obtain full and open competition through the use of competitive procedures in accordance with the requirements of this Section; and

use the competitive procedure or combination of competitive procedures that is best suited under the circumstances of the procurement.

In determining the competitive procedure appropriate under the circumstances, the Authority shall:

solicit sealed bids if:

time permits the solicitation, submission, and evaluation of sealed bids;

the award will be made on the basis of price and other price-related factors;

it is not necessary to conduct discussions with the responding sources about their bids; and

there is a reasonable expectation of receiving more than one sealed bid; or

request competitive proposals if sealed bids are not appropriate under clause (A) of this paragraph.

The Authority may provide for the procurement of property, services, or construction covered by this Section using competitive procedures but excluding a particular source in order to establish or maintain an alternative source or sources of supply for that property, service, or construction if the Authority determines that excluding the source would increase or maintain competition and would likely result in reduced overall costs for procurement of property, services, or construction.

The Authority may use procedures other than competitive procedures if:

the property, services, or construction needed by the Authority is available from only one responsible source and no other type of property, services, or construction will satisfy the needs of the Authority; or

the Authority’s need for the property, services, or construction is of such an unusual and compelling urgency that the Authority would be seriously injured unless the Authority limits the number of sources from which it solicits bids or proposals; or

the Authority determines that it is necessary in the public interest to use procedures other than competitive procedures in the particular procurement; or

the property or services needed can be obtained through federal or other governmental sources at reasonable prices.

For the purpose of applying subsection (c)(1) of this Section:

in the case of a contract for property, services, or construction to be awarded on the basis of acceptance of an unsolicited proposal, the property, services, or construction shall be deemed to be available from only one responsible source if the source has submitted an unsolicited proposal that demonstrates a concept:

that is unique and innovative or, in the case of a service, for which the source demonstrates a unique capability to provide the service; and

the substance of which is not otherwise available to the Authority and does not resemble the substance of a pending competitive procurement.

in the case of a follow-on contract for the continued development or production of a major system or highly specialized equipment or the continued provision of highly specialized services, the property, services, or construction may be deemed to be available from only the original source and may be procured through procedures other than competitive procedures if it is likely that award to a source other than the original source would result in:

substantial duplication of cost to the Authority that is not expected to be recovered through competition; or

unacceptable delays in fulfilling the Authority’s needs.

If the Authority uses procedures other than competitive procedures to procure property, services, or construction under subsection (c)(2) of this Section, the Authority shall request offers from as many potential sources as is practicable under the circumstances.

To promote efficiency and economy in contracting, the Authority may use simplified acquisition procedures for purchases of property, services and construction.

For the purposes of this subsection, simplified acquisition procedures may be used for purchases for an amount that does not exceed the simplified acquisition threshold adopted by the federal government.

A proposed purchase or contract for an amount above the simplified acquisition threshold may not be divided into several purchases or contracts for lesser amounts in order to use the procedures under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

In using simplified acquisition procedures, the Authority shall promote competition to the maximum extent practicable.

The Board shall adopt policies and procedures to implement this Section. The policies and procedures shall provide for publication of notice of procurements and other actions designed to secure competition where competitive procedures are used.

The Authority in its discretion may reject any and all bids or proposals received in response to a solicitation.Rights-of-Way

The Board is authorized to locate, construct and maintain any of its transit and related facilities in, upon, over, under or across any streets, highways, freeways, bridges and any other vehicular facilities, subject to the applicable laws governing such use of such facilities by public agencies. In the absence of such laws, such use of such facilities by the Board shall be subject to such reasonable conditions as the highway department or other affected agency of a Signatory party may require; provided, however, that the Board shall not construct or operate transit or related facilities upon, over, or across any parkways or park lands without the consent of, and except upon the terms and conditions required by, the agency having jurisdiction with respect to such parkways and park lands, but may construct or operate such facilities in a subway under such parkways or park lands upon such reasonable terms and conditions as may be specified by the agency having jurisdiction with respect thereto.Compliance with Laws, Regulations and Ordinances

The Board shall comply with all laws, ordinances and regulations of the Signatories and political subdivisions and agencies thereof with respect to use of streets, highways and all other vehicular facilities, traffic control and regulation, zoning, signs and buildings.Police Security

The Authority is authorized to establish and maintain a regular police force, to be known as the Metro Transit Police, to provide protection for its patrons, personnel, and Transit facilities. The Metro Transit Police shall have the powers and duties and shall be subject to the limitations set forth in this section. It shall be composed of both uniformed and plain clothes personnel and shall be charged with the duty of enforcing the laws of the Signatories, and the laws, ordinances, and regulations of the political subdivisions thereof in the Transit Zone, and the rules and regulations of the Authority. The jurisdiction of the Metro Transit Police shall include all the Transit facilities (including bus stops) owned, controlled, or operated by the Authority, but this restriction shall not limit the power of the Metro Transit Police to make arrests in the Transit Zone for violations committed upon, to, or against such Transit facilities committed from within or outside such Transit facilities while in hot or close pursuit, or to execute traffic citations and criminal process in accordance with subsection (c) below. The members of the Metro Transit Police shall have concurrent jurisdiction in the performance of their duties with the duly constituted law-enforcement agencies of the Signatories and of the political subdivisions thereof in which any Transit facility of the Authority is located or in which the Authority operates any Transit service. On-duty Metro Transit Police officers are authorized to make arrests off of Transit facilities within the Transit Zone when immediate action is necessary to protect the health, safety, welfare or property of an individual from actual or threatened harm or from an unlawful act. Nothing contained in this section shall either relieve any Signatory or political subdivision or agency thereof from its duty to provide police, fire, and other public safety service and protection, or limit, restrict, or interfere with the jurisdiction of or the performance of duties by the existing police, fire, and other public safety agencies. For purposes of this section, “bus stop” means that area within 150 feet of a MetroBus bus stop sign, excluding the interior of any building not owned, controlled or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

A member of the Metro Transit Police shall have same powers, including the power of arrest, and shall be subject to the same limitations, including regulatory limitations, in the performance of his duties as a member of the duly constituted police force of the political subdivision in which the Metro Transit Police member is engaged in the performance of his duties. A member of the Metro Transit Police is authorized to carry and use only such weapons, including handguns, as are issued by the Authority. A member of the Metro Transit Police is subject to such additional limitations in the use of weapons as are imposed on the duly constituted police force for the political subdivision in which he is engaged in the performance of his duties.

Members of the Metro Transit Police shall have power to execute on the Transit facilities owned, controlled, or operated by the Authority any traffic citation or any criminal process issued by any court of any Signatory or of any political subdivision of a Signatory, for any felony, misdemeanor, or other offense against the laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations specified in subsection (a). With respect to offenses committed upon, to, or against the Transit facilities owned, controlled, or operated by the Authority, the Metro Transit Police shall have power to execute criminal process within the Transit Zone.

Upon the apprehension or arrest of any person by a member of the Metro Transit Police pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b), the officer, as required by the law of the place of apprehension or arrest, shall either issue a summons or a citation against the person, book the person, or deliver the person to the duly constituted police or judicial officer of the Signatory or political subdivision where the apprehension or arrest is made, for disposition as required by law.

The Authority shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations for the safe, convenient, and orderly use of the Transit facilities owned, controlled, or operated by the Authority, including the payment and the manner of the payment of fares or charges therefor, the protection of the Transit facilities, the control of traffic and parking upon the Transit facilities, and the safety and protection of the riding public. In the event that any such rules and regulations contravene the laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations of a Signatory or any political subdivision thereof which are existing or subsequently enacted, these laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations of the Signatory or the political subdivision shall apply and the conflicting rule or regulation, or portion thereof, of the Authority shall be void within the jurisdiction of that Signatory or political subdivision. In all other respects the rules and regulations of the Authority shall be uniform throughout the Transit Zone. The rules and regulations established under this subsection shall be adopted by the Board following public hearings held in accordance with Section 62 (c) and (d) of this Compact. The final regulation shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the Zone at least 15 days before its effective date. Any person violating any rule or regulation of the Authority shall be subject to arrest and, upon conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall pay a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and costs. Criminal violations of any rule or regulation of the Authority shall be prosecuted by the Signatory or political subdivision in which the violation occurred, in the same manner by which violations of law, ordinances, rules and regulations of the Signatory or political subdivisions are prosecuted.

With respect to members of the Metro Transit Police, the Authority shall:

Establish classifications based on the nature and scope of duties, and fix and provide for their qualification, appointment, removal, tenure, term, compensation, pension, and retirement benefits;

Provide for their training and, for this purpose, the Authority may enter into contracts or agreements with any public or private organization engaged in police training, and this training and the qualifications of the uniformed and plain clothes personnel shall at least equal the requirements of each Signatory and of the political subdivisions therein in the Transit Zone for their personnel performing comparable duties; and

Prescribe distinctive uniforms to be worn.

The Authority shall have the power to enter into agreements with the Signatories, the political subdivisions thereof in the Transit Zone, and public safety agencies located therein, including those of the Federal Government, for the delineation of the functions and responsibilities of the Metro Transit Police and the duly constituted police, fire, and other public safety agencies, and for mutual assistance.

Before entering upon the duties of office, each member of the Metro Transit Police shall take or subscribe to an oath or affirmation, before a person authorized to administer oaths, faithfully to perform the duties of that office.Exemption from Regulation

Except as otherwise provided in this Title, any Transit service rendered by Transit facilities owned or controlled by the Authority and the Authority or any corporation, firm or association performing such transit service pursuant to an operating contract with the Authority, shall, in connection with the performance of such service, be exempt from all laws, rules, regulations and orders of the Signatories and of the United States otherwise applicable to such transit service and persons, except that laws, rules, regulations and orders relating to inspection of equipment and facilities, safety and testing shall remain in force and effect; provided, however, that the Board may promulgate regulations for the safety of the public and employees not inconsistent with the applicable laws, rules, regulations or orders of the Signatories and of the United States.Tax Exemption

It is hereby declared that the creation of the Authority and the carrying out of the corporate purposes of the Authority is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Signatory states and is for a public purpose and that the Authority and the Board will be performing an essential governmental function, including, without limitation, proprietary, governmental and other functions, in the exercise of the powers conferred by this Title. Accordingly, the Authority and the Board shall not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession or supervision or upon its activities in the operation and maintenance of any Transit facilities or upon any revenues therefrom and the property and income derived therefrom shall be exempt from all federal, State, District of Columbia, municipal and local taxation. This exemption shall include, without limitation, all motor vehicle license fees, sales taxes and motor fuel taxes.Reduced Fares

The District of Columbia, the Northern Virginia Transportation District, the Washington Suburban Transit District and the component governments thereof, may enter into contracts or agreements with the Authority to make equitable payments for fares lower than those established by the Authority pursuant to the provisions of Article XIII hereof for any specified class or category of riders.Liability for Contracts and Torts

The Authority shall be liable for its contracts and for its torts and those of its Directors, officers, employees and agents committed in the conduct of any proprietary function, in accordance with the law of the applicable Signatory (including rules on conflict of laws), but shall not be liable for any torts occurring in the performance of a governmental function. The exclusive remedy for such breach of contracts and torts for which the Authority shall be liable, as herein provided, shall be by suit against the Authority. Nothing contained in this Title shall be construed as a waiver by the District of Columbia, Maryland, Virginia and the counties and cities within the Zone of any immunity from suit.Jurisdiction of Courts

The United States District Courts shall have original jurisdiction, concurrent with the courts of Maryland, Virginia and the District of Columbia, of all actions brought by or against the Authority and to enforce subpoenas issued under this Title. Any such action initiated in a State or District of Columbia Court shall be removable to the appropriate United States District Court in the manner provided by Act of June 25, 1948, as amended (28 U.S.C. 1446).Condemnation

The Authority shall have the power to acquire by condemnation, whenever in its opinion it is necessary or advantageous to the Authority to do so, any real or personal property, or any interest therein, necessary or useful for the transit system authorized herein, except property owned by the United States, by a Signatory, or any political subdivision thereof, whenever such property cannot be acquired by negotiated purchase at a price satisfactory to the Authority.

Proceedings for the condemnation of property in the District of Columbia shall be instituted and maintained under the Act of December 23, 1963 (77 Stat. 577-581, D.C. Code 1961, Supp. IV, Sections 1351-1368). Proceedings for the condemnation of property located elsewhere within the Zone shall be instituted and maintained, if applicable, pursuant to the provisions of the Act of August 1, 1888, as amended (25 Stat. 357,40 U.S.C. 257) and the Act of June 25, 1948 (62 Stat. 935 and 937,28 U.S.C. 1358 and 1403) or any other applicable act; provided, however, that if there is no applicable federal law, condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of the state law of the Signatory in which the property is located governing condemnation by the highway agency of such state. Whenever the words “real property,” “realty,” “land,” “easement,” “right-of-way,” or words of similar meaning are used in any applicable federal or state law relating to procedure, jurisdiction and venue, they shall be deemed, for the purposes of this Title, to include any personal property authorized to be acquired hereunder.

Any award or compensation for the taking of property pursuant to this Title shall be paid by the Authority, and none of the Signatory parties nor any other agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof shall be liable for such award or compensation.Enlargement and Withdrawal; Duration

When advised in writing by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission or the Washington Suburban Transit Commission that the geographical area embraced therein has been enlarged, the Board, upon such terms and conditions as it may deem appropriate, shall by resolution enlarge the Zone to embrace the additional area.

The duration of this Title shall be perpetual but any Signatory thereto may withdraw therefrom upon two years’ written notice to the Board.

The withdrawal of any Signatory shall not relieve such Signatory, any transportation district, county or city or other political subdivision thereof from any obligation to the Authority, or inuring to the benefit of the Authority, created by contract or otherwise.Amendments and Supplements

Amendments and supplements to this Title to implement the purposes thereof may be adopted by legislative action of any of the Signatory parties concurred in by all of the others. When one Signatory adopts an amendment or supplement to an existing Section of the Compact, that amendment or supplement shall not be immediately effective, and the previously enacted provision or provisions shall remain in effect in each jurisdiction until the amendment or supplement is approved by the other Signatories and is consented to by Congress.Construction and Severability

The provisions of this Title and of the agreements thereunder shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Title or any such agreement is declared to be unconstitutional or the applicability thereof to any Signatory party, political subdivision or agency thereof is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this Title or any such agreement and the applicability thereof to any other Signatory party, political subdivision or agency thereof or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this Title be reasonably and liberally construed.Effective Date; Execution

This Title shall be adopted by the Signatories in the manner provided by law therefor and shall be signed and sealed in four duplicate original copies. One such copy shall be filed with the Secretary of State of each of the Signatory parties or in accordance with laws of the State in which the filing is made, and one copy shall be filed and retained in the archives of the Authority upon its organization. This Title shall become effective ninety days after the enactment of concurring legislation by or on behalf of the District of Columbia, Maryland and Virginia and consent thereto by the Congress and all other acts or actions have been taken, including the signing and execution of the Title by the Governors of Maryland and Virginia and the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia.

History.

1966, c. 2; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 21; 1970, c. 590; 1972, c. 571; 1973, c. 508; 1974, c. 576; 1977, c. 592; 1981, c. 378; 1984, c. 610; 1987, c. 112; 1995, c. 150; 1997, c. 736; 2009, cc. 771, 828; §

56-529

; 2014, c. 805; 2016, c. 535.

Compact cross references.

As to provisions of other member states, see:

District of Columbia: D.C. Code § 9-1107.01 et seq.

Maryland: Md. Transportation Code Ann. § 10-204.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, relating to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact of 1966, was enacted by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014 (formerly by Acts 1966, c. 2, as amended).

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 12 provides: “That (i) the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) was established pursuant to an interstate compact between Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia to operate a regional mass transit system in the Washington, D.C., metropolitan area; (ii) WMATA is currently the second largest rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the sixth largest bus mass transportation system in the United States; (iii) Section 16 of the WMATA compact embodies the funding principle that “the payment of the costs shall be borne by the persons using or benefiting from the Authority’s facilities and services and any remaining costs shall be equitably shared among the federal, District of Columbia and participating local governments”; (iv) the operation of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the bus mass transportation system by WMATA provides particular and substantial benefit to the persons living, traveling, commuting, and working in those localities embraced by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission; (v) the benefits to such persons include not only access to the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the bus mass transportation system operated by WMATA but also the lessened congestion on roadways and highways as a result of such operations; and (vi) on a typical weekday more than 340,000 trips are taken on WMATA in Virginia. On the basis of these facts, the General Assembly finds that dedicated funding is appropriate and necessary to support the capital needs of WMATA’s rapid heavy rail mass transportation system.”

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 13 provides: “That Virginia shall seek to appoint members to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) Board of Directors (i) with experience in transit, transportation, or land use planning; transit, transportation, or other public-sector management; engineering; finance; public safety; homeland security; human resources; or the law and (ii) who are familiar with the WMATA system.”

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 14 provides: “That, for projects initiated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority on and after July 1, 2018, and located solely within the Commonwealth, bidders, offers, contractors, or subcontractors (i) shall not, as a condition of the contract, be required to enter into or adhere to or prohibited from entering into or adhering to agreements with one or more labor organizations and (ii) shall not otherwise be discriminated against for becoming or refusing to become or remain signatories or otherwise adhere to agreements with one or more labor organizations.” Acts 2020, cc. 282 and 373, cl. 1 deleted enactment clause 14 of Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 535, in subdivision 5 (a) substituted “Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation” for “Administrator of General Services.”